Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Territorial Applicability and General Rules.

Sec. 45.01.301.
Territorial applicability; parties’ power to choose applicable law.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, when a transaction bears a reasonable relation to this state and also to another state or nation, the parties may agree that the law of this state or of the other state or nation shall govern the parties’ rights and duties.

In the absence of an agreement effective under (a) of this section, and except as provided in (c) of this section, the code applies to transactions bearing an appropriate relation to this state.

If one of the following provisions of the code specifies the applicable law, that provision governs, and a contrary agreement is effective only to the extent permitted by the applicable law specified by that provision:

AS

45.02.402

;

AS

45.04.102

;

AS

45.05.116

;

AS

45.08.110

;

AS

45.12.105

and

45.12.106

;

AS

45.14.507

;

AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.307

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.302.
Variation by agreement.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section or elsewhere in the code, the effect of provisions of the code may be varied by agreement.

The obligations of good faith, diligence, reasonableness, and care prescribed by the code may not be disclaimed by agreement. The parties, by agreement, may determine the standards by which the performance of those obligations is to be measured if those standards are not manifestly unreasonable. Whenever the code requires an action to be taken within a reasonable time, a time that is not manifestly unreasonable may be fixed by agreement.

The presence in certain provisions of the code of the phrase “unless otherwise agreed,” or words of similar import, does not imply that the effect of other provisions may not be varied by agreement under this section.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.303.
Course of performance, course of dealing, and usage of trade.

A “course of performance” is a sequence of conduct between the parties to a particular transaction that exists if the

agreement of the parties with respect to the transaction involves repeated occasions for performance by a party; and

other party, with knowledge of the nature of the performance and opportunity for objection to it, accepts the performance or acquiesces in it without objection.

A “course of dealing” is a sequence of conduct concerning previous transactions between the parties to a particular transaction that is fairly to be regarded as establishing a common basis of understanding for interpreting the parties’ expressions and other conduct.

A “usage of trade” is a practice or method of dealing having the regularity of observance in a place, vocation, or trade as to justify an expectation that it will be observed with respect to the transaction in question. The existence and scope of a usage of trade must be proved as facts. If it is established that a usage of trade is embodied in a trade code or similar record, the interpretation of the record is a question of law.

A course of performance or course of dealing between the parties or usage of trade in the vocation or trade in which they are engaged or of which they are or should be aware is relevant in ascertaining the meaning of the parties’ agreement, may give particular meaning to specific terms of the agreement, and may supplement or qualify the terms of the agreement. A usage of trade applicable in the place in which part of the performance under the agreement is to occur may be used as indicated in the previous sentence as to that part of the performance.

Except as otherwise provided in (f) of this section, the express terms of an agreement and an applicable course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade must be construed whenever reasonable as consistent with each other. If this construction is unreasonable,

express terms prevail over course of performance, course of dealing, and usage of trade;

course of performance prevails over course of dealing and usage of trade; and

course of dealing prevails over usage of trade.

Subject to AS

45.02.209

, a course of performance is relevant to show a waiver or modification of a term inconsistent with the course of performance.

Evidence of a relevant usage of trade offered by one party is not admissible unless that party has given the other party notice that the court finds sufficient to prevent unfair surprise to the other party.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

For effect of provisions of (g) of this section on Rule 403 (requiring exclusion of certain relevant evidence relating to usage of trade) of the Alaska Rules of Evidence, see § 114(a), ch. 44, SLA 2009 in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.01.304.
Obligation of good faith.

Every contract or duty within the code imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance and enforcement.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.305.
Remedies to be liberally administered.

The remedies provided by the code must be liberally administered to the end that the aggrieved party may be put in as good a position as if the other party had fully performed, but neither consequential or special damages nor penal damages may be had except as specifically provided in the code or by other rule of law.

A right or obligation declared by the code is enforceable by action unless the provision declaring it specifies a different and limited effect.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.306.
Waiver or renunciation of claim or right after breach.

A claim or right arising out of an alleged breach may be discharged in whole or in part without consideration by agreement of the aggrieved party in an authenticated record.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.307.
Prima facie evidence by third-party documents.

A document in due form purporting to be a bill of lading, policy or certificate of insurance, official weigher’s or inspector’s certificate, consular invoice, or another document authorized or required by the contract to be issued by a third party is prima facie evidence of its own authenticity and genuineness and of the facts stated in the document by the third party.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

For effect of provisions of this section on Rule 902 (establishing the authenticity and stated facts of certain documents) of the Alaska Rules of Evidence, see § 114(b), ch. 44, SLA 2009 in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.01.308.
Performance or acceptance under reservation of rights.

A party who, with explicit reservation of rights, performs or promises performance or assents to performance in a manner demanded or offered by the other party does not by the performance, promise, or assent prejudice the rights reserved. The words, “without prejudice,” “under protest,” or the like are sufficient.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to an accord and satisfaction.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.309.
Option to accelerate at will.

A term providing that one party or that party’s successor in interest may accelerate payment or performance or require collateral or additional collateral “at will” or when the party “deems itself insecure,” or words of similar import, means that the party has power to make the acceleration or requirement only if that party in good faith believes that the prospect of payment or performance is impaired. The burden of establishing lack of good faith is on the party against whom the power has been exercised.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Sec. 45.01.310.
Subordinated obligations.

An obligation may be issued as subordinated to performance of another obligation of the person obligated, or a creditor may subordinate its right to performance of an obligation by agreement with either the person obligated or another creditor of the person obligated. Subordination does not create a security interest as against either the common debtor or a subordinated creditor.

History.

(§ 9 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.